Utah statutes.
62A-11-508.   Termination of income withholding.
(1) (a)  At any time after the date income withholding begins, a party to the
child support order may request a court to determine whether income
withholding should be terminated due to:
(i)  good cause under Section 62A-11-502; or
(ii)  the completion of an obligor's support obligation.
(b)  An obligor's payment of overdue child support may not be the sole basis
for termination of income withholding.
(c)  After termination of income withholding under this section, a party may
seek reinstatement of income withholding under Section 62A-11-504.
(2) (a)  If it is determined that income withholding should be terminated
under Subsection (1)(a)(i), the court shall order written notice of
termination be given to each payor within 10 days after receipt of notice of
that decision.
(b)  The obligee shall give written notice of termination to each payor:
(i)  when the obligor no longer owes child support to the obligee; or
(ii)  if the obligee and obligor enter into a written agreement that provides
an alternative arrangement, which may be filed with the court.
(3)  A notice to withhold income is binding on a payor until the court or the
obligee notifies the payor that his obligation to withhold income has been
terminated.
